Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the Department of the  State Fire Marshal, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the following amounts,  for the
following purposes:
(1) Office of the State Fire
Marshal ..................................... $ 2,588,904
(2) Business services ...................... $ 13,051,121
(3) Emergency response ................. $ 11,313,068
(4) Fire and life safety services ..... $ 6,275,378
(5) Fire and life safety education ... $ 5,608,772
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and  federal funds, collected or received by the Department of the State
Fire Marshal, for the following purposes:
(1) Office of the State Fire
Marshal, business services,
emergency response, fire and
life safety services, fire
and life safety education ........... $ 48,237,491
(2) Regulatory services................... $ 5,403,945
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $629,349
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses from federal funds collected or received by the  Department of the State Fire
Marshal.
SECTION 4.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5538 (SB 5538-A) Page 1
Passed by Senate June 16, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 24, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5538 (SB 5538-A) Page 2